Massachusetts, session 194th, H4275.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in the third sentence of the twelfth
paragraph, the words “alcoholic beverage sales” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- all sales.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 138 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, there shall be no distinction between a supermarket,
convenience store or package store whenever the holder of a license issued under the provisions
of section 15 of chapter 138 is found to have been in violation of section 34 of said chapter
relative to the sale of alcohol to a minor or to an intoxicated individual that results in the
suspension of all commercial activity by the licensee as adjudicated by the local licensing
authority in any city or town which votes to authorize the granting of licenses for the sale of all
alcoholic beverages. For the purposes of this paragraph, the suspension of commercial activity
for a licensee shall mean that all commercial activity, including the sale of non-alcoholic items,
within the licensed establishment shall cease for the period of the suspension.
of 1